Hawaii statutes.
§171-41 Commercial, industrial, and other
business uses. (a) Leases for commercial, industrial, and other business
uses shall be made only pursuant to a development plan which provides for
careful placement of complementary enterprises consistent with county zoning
requirements; except that development plans for leases of parcels in industrial
parks developed under section 171-134(b) shall provide for careful placement of
complementary enterprises consistent with the final plans and specifications
under section 171-134(b). Where a disposition for any such use is made without
advance parcelization, the board shall make adequate provisions for the
compatibility of the proposed enterprises with any existing surrounding private
developments. The board, wherever possible, shall control the landscaping and
architecture of the enterprises and protect the public against the creation of
nuisances of smoke, soot, irritating odors and gases, and harmful wastes.

(b) The board may sell public land in fee
simple for commercial, industrial, or other business uses with the prior
approval of the governor and subject to disapproval by two-thirds vote of
either the senate or the house of representatives or by majority vote of both
in any regular or special session next following the date of disposition;
provided the above restrictions shall not apply to any sale of land initially
acquired for highway purposes with participating federal funds and which land
is later found to be in excess of the need for highway purposes. [L 1962, c 32,
pt of §2; am L 1963, c 196, §1; am L 1965, c 239, §20; Supp, §103A-41; HRS
§171-41; am L 1972, c 38, §1; am L 1988, c 361, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next